Oklahoma, session 2025, SB562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1902, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1902. As used in the Bus Passenger Safety Act:
1. “Bus” means a vehicle designed to carry passengers that is
part of a network of passenger vehicles for use by the public,
running on a regular schedule of routes, times, and fares;
2. “Bus transportation company” or “company” means any person
or governmental entity providing for-hire transport to passengers or
cargo by bus rolling stock transit vehicles upon the roads, streets,
highways, public or dedicated rights-of-way, and turnpikes of this
state;
3. “Deadly or dangerous weapon” includes all weapons listed in
Section 1287 of this title, and any other weapon capable of
inflicting serious bodily injury, except for a weapon carried for

lawful self-defense in compliance under the Oklahoma Self Defense
Self-Defense Act;
4. “Passenger” means any person served by the bus
transportation company; and
5. “Rolling stock transit vehicles” include buses, vans, cars,
railcars, locomotives, trolley cars, ferry boats, and vehicles used
for transporting the public; and
6. “Terminal” means a bus station, stop, platform, or depot or
any facility operated or leased by or operated on behalf of a bus
transportation company. This term shall include a reasonable area
immediately adjacent to any designated stop along the route traveled
by any bus rolling stock transit vehicle operated by a bus
transportation company and parking lots or parking areas adjacent to
a terminal.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1903, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1903. A. No person shall by force or violence, or
threat of force or violence, seize or exercise control of any bus
rolling stock transit vehicle. Any person violating this subsection
shall be guilty of a felony and shall, upon conviction, be punished
by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for
not more than twenty (20) years, or by a fine of not more than
Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
B. In addition, no No person shall intimidate, threaten,
assault, or batter any driver, attendant, guard, or passenger of any
bus with intent to violate subsection A of this section rolling
stock transit vehicle or cause disruption to the provided service or
cause harm to any person. Any person violating this subsection
shall be guilty of a felony and shall, upon conviction, be punished
by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for
not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than Five
Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
C. In addition, any Any person violating subsection A or B of
this section using a dangerous or deadly weapon shall be guilty of a
ENR. S. B. NO. 562 Page 2

felony, and shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in
the custody of the Department of Corrections for not more than
twenty (20) years, or by a fine of not more than Twenty Thousand
Dollars ($20,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
D. It shall be unlawful for any person to discharge any firearm
into or within any bus rolling stock transit vehicle, terminal, or
other transportation facility, unless such action is determined to
have been in defensive force resulting from reasonable fear of
imminent peril of death or great bodily harm to himself or herself
or another. Such person shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
felony punishable by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00) or, by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for not more than five (5) years, or by both such fine
and imprisonment.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 562 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 562 Page 4